District of Columbia statutes.
42-145

Notarial acts under federal authority.

(a)

A notarial act shall have the same effect under the law of the District as if the notarial act had been performed by a notarial officer of the District if the notarial act is performed anywhere under authority granted by the law of the United States by:

(1)

A judge, clerk, or deputy clerk of a court;

(2)

A commissioned officer on active duty in the military service of the United States as provided in 10 U.S.C. § 936;

(3)

An officer of the foreign service or consular officer of the United States as provided in §§ 3 and 7 of An Act To provide for the reorganization of the consular service of the United States, approved April 5, 1906 (34 Stat. 101; 22 U.S.C. § 4215 passim); or

(4)

Any other person authorized by federal law to perform a notarial act.

(b)

The signature and title of a person who performs a notarial act under federal authority are prima facie evidence that the signature is genuine and that the person holds the designated title.

(c)

The signature and indicated title of an officer listed in subsection (a)(1), (2), or (3) of this section shall establish conclusively the authority of a holder of that title to perform a notarial act.

Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-205, § 6, 37 DCR 8444
This section is referenced in § 42-143 and § 42-144.
1981 Ed., § 45-625.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 5 of the Uniform Law on Notarial Acts.